Washington statutes.
RCW 43.33.040

Rules and regulations—Chair.

The state finance committee may make appropriate rules and regulations for the performance of its duties. The state treasurer shall act as chair of the committee.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5112; 1965 c 8 s 43.33.040. Prior: 1907 c 12 s 3; RRS s 5538.]